Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.12
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; appraisal; agreement as to value.

The board shall make an appraisal of the lessee's permitted improvements and growing crops and attempt to arrive at an agreement with the lessee as to the value of the permitted improvements owned by such lessee.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 3, p. 1452;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 4.